West Virginia, session 2026, HB4324.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 10. Authorization for Department of commerce to promulgate legislative rules. §64-10-1. Division of Forestry. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on July 25, 2025, authorized under the authority of 11-1C-11 of this code, modified by the Division of Forestry to meet the objections of the Legislative Rule-Making Review Committee and refiled in the State Register on December 10, 2025, relating to the Division of Forestry (rules for the certification of managed timberland, 22 CSR 06), is authorized.